Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.410

Basic education certificated instructional staff—Salary allocation methodology—Adjustments for regional differences—Review and rebasing of regionalization factors.

(1) Through the 2017-18 school year, the legislature shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW 28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations for classroom teachers, teacher-librarians, counselors, and student health services staff under RCW 28A.150.260 are considered allocations for certificated instructional staff.

(2) Through the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for state-funded basic education certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions, and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.

(3) Through the 2017-18 school year, no more than 90 college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a master's degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(4) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year and through the 2017-18 school year, the calculation of years of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists. The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement system benefits.

(5) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for certificated instructional staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of $64,000 adjusted for inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(6) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for certificated administrative staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of $95,000 adjusted for inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(7) By the 2018-19 school year, the minimum state allocation for salaries for classified staff in the basic education program must be increased to provide a statewide average allocation of $45,912 adjusted by inflation from the 2017-18 school year.

(8) For school year 2018-19, a district's minimum state allocation for salaries is the greater of the district's 2017-18 state salary allocation, adjusted for inflation, or the district's allocation based on the state salary level specified in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, and as further specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(9) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, state allocations for salaries for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff must be adjusted for regional differences in the cost of hiring staff. Adjustments for regional differences must be specified in the omnibus appropriations act for each school year through at least school year 2022-23. For school years 2018-19 through school year 2022-23, the school district regionalization factors are based on the median single-family residential value of each school district and proximate school district median single-family residential value as described in RCW 28A.150.412.

(10) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year and every four years thereafter, the minimum state salary allocations and school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff must be reviewed and rebased, as provided under RCW 28A.150.412, to ensure that state salary allocations continue to align with staffing costs for the state's program of basic education.

(11) For the purposes of this section, "inflation" has the meaning provided in RCW 28A.400.205 for "inflationary adjustment index."

[ 2022 c 109 s 7; 2018 c 266 s 202; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 101; 2010 c 236 s 10; 2007 c 403 s 1; 2002 c 353 s 1; 1997 c 141 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 118; 1989 1st ex.s. c 16 s 1; 1987 3rd ex.s. c 1 s 4; 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 204. Formerly RCW 28A.41.112.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 109 ss 3, 6, and 7: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Intent—2022 c 109: See note following RCW 28A.300.476.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 266: "The legislature recognizes that Initiative Measure No. 1433 was approved by the voters of the state of Washington in 2016 requiring employers to provide paid sick leave to each of its employees. The legislature acknowledges that the enactment of this initiative contributes to the costs of operations of the state's public schools and intends to provide funding in the omnibus appropriations act to support school districts with these additional costs." [ 2018 c 266 s 201.]

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: "The state must provide education funding that corresponds to the cost of providing all students with the opportunity to learn through the state's statutory program of basic education. In chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2261) and chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (Substitute House Bill No. 2776), the state established a comprehensive plan for enhancing the state's program of basic education. With this act, the legislature intends to realize the promise of these reforms and to improve student outcomes by increasing state allocations for school staff salaries, by revising state and local education funding contributions, and by improving transparency and accountability of education funding." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 1.]

Effective date—2010 c 236 ss 2, 3, 4, 8, 10, 13, and 14: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Effective date—2002 c 353: "This act takes effect September 1, 2002." [ 2002 c 353 s 3.]

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 84.52.0531.